Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-15,289
Mobile home parks; minimum requirements; violations; enforcement, penalties, or other remedies; established by local government; nuisance; penalty; removal.

Any person who establishes, conducts, operates, or maintains a mobile home park in violation of the minimum requirements of a mobile home park established by the local government which exercises jurisdiction over such mobile home park shall be subject to enforcement, penalties, or other remedies as established by the local government. Such person shall also be guilty of maintaining a nuisance pursuant to section 28-1321, and upon conviction thereof, in addition to payment of the fine, such nuisance shall be removed.

Laws 1976, LB 91, § 12;

Laws 1977, LB 41, § 61;

Laws 1978, LB 748, § 38;

R.S.1943, (2018), § 71-4632;

Laws 2021, LB148, § 29;

Laws 2026, LB759, § 36.
July 18, 2026